Illinois, session 104th, HB3724.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-175 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-175)7    Sec. 15-175. General homestead exemption. 8    (a) Except as provided in Sections 15-176 and 15-177, 9homestead property is entitled to an annual homestead 10exemption limited, except as described here with relation to 11cooperatives or life care facilities, to a reduction in the 12equalized assessed value of homestead property equal to the 13increase in equalized assessed value for the current 14assessment year above the equalized assessed value of the 15property for 1977, up to the maximum reduction set forth 16below. If however, the 1977 equalized assessed value upon 17which taxes were paid is subsequently determined by local 18assessing officials, the Property Tax Appeal Board, or a court 19to have been excessive, the equalized assessed value which 20should have been placed on the property for 1977 shall be used 21to determine the amount of the exemption.22    (b) Except as provided in Section 15-176, the maximum 23reduction before taxable year 2004 shall be $4,500 in counties   HB3724- 2 -LRB104 03563 HLH 21339 b1with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $3,500 in all other 2counties. Except as provided in Sections 15-176 and 15-177, 3for taxable years 2004 through 2007, the maximum reduction 4shall be $5,000, for taxable year 2008, the maximum reduction 5is $5,500, and, for taxable years 2009 through 2011, the 6maximum reduction is $6,000 in all counties. For taxable years 72012 through 2016, the maximum reduction is $7,000 in counties 8with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $6,000 in all other 9counties. For taxable years 2017 through 2022, the maximum 10reduction is $10,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or more 11inhabitants and $6,000 in all other counties. For taxable 12years 2023 and thereafter, the maximum reduction is $10,000 in 13counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, $8,000 in 14counties that are contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or more 15inhabitants, and $6,000 in all other counties. If a county has 16elected to subject itself to the provisions of Section 15-176 17as provided in subsection (k) of that Section, then, for the 18first taxable year only after the provisions of Section 15-176 19no longer apply, for owners who, for the taxable year, have not 20been granted a senior citizens assessment freeze homestead 21exemption under Section 15-172 or a long-time occupant 22homestead exemption under Section 15-177, there shall be an 23additional exemption of $5,000 for owners with a household 24income of $30,000 or less. 25    (c) In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if, 26based on the most recent assessment, the equalized assessed   HB3724- 3 -LRB104 03563 HLH 21339 b1value of the homestead property for the current assessment 2year is greater than the equalized assessed value of the 3property for 1977, the owner of the property shall 4automatically receive the exemption granted under this Section 5in an amount equal to the increase over the 1977 assessment up 6to the maximum reduction set forth in this Section.7    (d) If in any assessment year beginning with the 2000 8assessment year, homestead property has a pro-rata valuation 9under Section 9-180 resulting in an increase in the assessed 10valuation, a reduction in equalized assessed valuation equal 11to the increase in equalized assessed value of the property 12for the year of the pro-rata valuation above the equalized 13assessed value of the property for 1977 shall be applied to the 14property on a proportionate basis for the period the property 15qualified as homestead property during the assessment year. 16The maximum proportionate homestead exemption shall not exceed 17the maximum homestead exemption allowed in the county under 18this Section divided by 365 and multiplied by the number of 19days the property qualified as homestead property.20    (d-1) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 21where the chief county assessment officer provides a notice of 22discovery, if a property is not occupied by its owner as a 23principal residence as of January 1 of the current tax year, 24then the property owner shall notify the chief county 25assessment officer of that fact on a form prescribed by the 26chief county assessment officer. That notice must be received   HB3724- 4 -LRB104 03563 HLH 21339 b1by the chief county assessment officer on or before March 1 of 2the collection year. If mailed, the form shall be sent by 3certified mail, return receipt requested. If the form is 4provided in person, the chief county assessment officer shall 5provide a date stamped copy of the notice. Failure to provide 6timely notice pursuant to this subsection (d-1) shall result 7in the exemption being treated as an erroneous exemption. Upon 8timely receipt of the notice for the current tax year, no 9exemption shall be applied to the property for the current tax 10year. If the exemption is not removed upon timely receipt of 11the notice by the chief assessment officer, then the error is 12considered granted as a result of a clerical error or omission 13on the part of the chief county assessment officer as 14described in subsection (h) of Section 9-275, and the property 15owner shall not be liable for the payment of interest and 16penalties due to the erroneous exemption for the current tax 17year for which the notice was filed after the date that notice 18was timely received pursuant to this subsection. Notice 19provided under this subsection shall not constitute a defense 20or amnesty for prior year erroneous exemptions. 21    For the purposes of this subsection (d-1): 22    "Collection year" means the year in which the first and 23second installment of the current tax year is billed. 24    "Current tax year" means the year prior to the collection 25year. 26    (e) The chief county assessment officer may, when   HB3724- 5 -LRB104 03563 HLH 21339 b1considering whether to grant a leasehold exemption under this 2Section, require the following conditions to be met: 3        (1) that a notarized application for the exemption, 4    signed by both the owner and the lessee of the property, 5    must be submitted each year during the application period 6    in effect for the county in which the property is located; 7        (2) that a copy of the lease must be filed with the 8    chief county assessment officer by the owner of the 9    property at the time the notarized application is 10    submitted;11        (3) that the lease must expressly state that the 12    lessee is liable for the payment of property taxes; and 13        (4) that the lease must include the following language 14    in substantially the following form: 15            "Lessee shall be liable for the payment of real 16        estate taxes with respect to the residence in 17        accordance with the terms and conditions of Section 18        15-175 of the Property Tax Code (35 ILCS 200/15-175). 19        The permanent real estate index number for the 20        premises is (insert number), and, according to the 21        most recent property tax bill, the current amount of 22        real estate taxes associated with the premises is 23        (insert amount) per year. The parties agree that the 24        monthly rent set forth above shall be increased or 25        decreased pro rata (effective January 1 of each 26        calendar year) to reflect any increase or decrease in   HB3724- 6 -LRB104 03563 HLH 21339 b1        real estate taxes. Lessee shall be deemed to be 2        satisfying Lessee's liability for the above mentioned 3        real estate taxes with the monthly rent payments as 4        set forth above (or increased or decreased as set 5        forth herein).". 6    In addition, if there is a change in lessee, or if the 7lessee vacates the property, then the chief county assessment 8officer may require the owner of the property to notify the 9chief county assessment officer of that change. 10    This subsection (e) does not apply to leasehold interests 11in property owned by a municipality. 12    (f) "Homestead property" under this Section includes 13residential property that is occupied by its owner or owners 14as his or their principal dwelling place, or that is a 15leasehold interest on which a single family residence is 16situated, which is occupied as a residence by a person who has 17an ownership interest therein, legal or equitable or as a 18lessee, and on which the person is liable for the payment of 19property taxes. For land improved with an apartment building 20owned and operated as a cooperative, the maximum reduction 21from the equalized assessed value shall be limited to the 22increase in the value above the equalized assessed value of 23the property for 1977, up to the maximum reduction set forth 24above, multiplied by the number of apartments or units 25occupied by a person or persons who is liable, by contract with 26the owner or owners of record, for paying property taxes on the   HB3724- 7 -LRB104 03563 HLH 21339 b1property and is an owner of record of a legal or equitable 2interest in the cooperative apartment building, other than a 3leasehold interest. For land improved with a life care 4facility, the maximum reduction from the value of the 5property, as equalized by the Department, shall be multiplied 6by the number of apartments or units occupied by a person or 7persons, irrespective of any legal, equitable, or leasehold 8interest in the facility, who are liable, under a life care 9contract with the owner or owners of record of the facility, 10for paying property taxes on the property. For purposes of 11this Section, the term "life care facility" has the meaning 12stated in Section 15-170.13    "Household", as used in this Section, means the owner, the 14spouse of the owner, and all persons using the residence of the 15owner as their principal place of residence.16    "Household income", as used in this Section, means the 17combined income of the members of a household for the calendar 18year preceding the taxable year.19    "Income", as used in this Section, has the same meaning as 20provided in Section 3.07 of the Senior Citizens and Persons 21with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, except that 22"income" does not include veteran's benefits. 23    (g) In a cooperative or life care facility where a 24homestead exemption has been granted, the cooperative 25association or the management of the cooperative or life care 26facility shall credit the savings resulting from that   HB3724- 8 -LRB104 03563 HLH 21339 b1exemption only to the apportioned tax liability of the owner 2or resident who qualified for the exemption. Any person who 3willfully refuses to so credit the savings shall be guilty of a 4Class B misdemeanor. 5    (h) Where married persons maintain and reside in separate 6residences qualifying as homestead property, each residence 7shall receive 50% of the total reduction in equalized assessed 8valuation provided by this Section.9    (i) In all counties, the assessor or chief county 10assessment officer may determine the eligibility of 11residential property to receive the homestead exemption and 12the amount of the exemption by application, visual inspection, 13questionnaire or other reasonable methods. The determination 14shall be made in accordance with guidelines established by the 15Department, provided that the taxpayer applying for an 16additional general exemption under this Section shall submit 17to the chief county assessment officer an application with an 18affidavit of the applicant's total household income, age, 19marital status (and, if married, the name and address of the 20applicant's spouse, if known), and principal dwelling place of 21members of the household on January 1 of the taxable year. The 22Department shall issue guidelines establishing a method for 23verifying the accuracy of the affidavits filed by applicants 24under this paragraph. The applications shall be clearly marked 25as applications for the Additional General Homestead 26Exemption.   HB3724- 9 -LRB104 03563 HLH 21339 b1    (i-5) This subsection (i-5) applies to counties with 23,000,000 or more inhabitants. In the event of a sale of 3homestead property, the homestead exemption shall remain in 4effect for the remainder of the assessment year of the sale. 5Upon receipt of a transfer declaration transmitted by the 6recorder pursuant to Section 31-30 of the Real Estate Transfer 7Tax Law for property receiving an exemption under this 8Section, the assessor shall mail a notice and forms to the new 9owner of the property providing information pertaining to the 10rules and applicable filing periods for applying or reapplying 11for homestead exemptions under this Code for which the 12property may be eligible. If the new owner fails to apply or 13reapply for a homestead exemption during the applicable filing 14period or the property no longer qualifies for an existing 15homestead exemption, the assessor shall cancel such exemption 16for any ensuing assessment year. 17    (j) In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, in 18the event of a sale of homestead property the homestead 19exemption shall remain in effect for the remainder of the 20assessment year of the sale. The assessor or chief county 21assessment officer may require the new owner of the property 22to apply for the homestead exemption for the following 23assessment year.24    (k) Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 25Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 26implementation of any mandate created by this Section.   HB3724- 10 -LRB104 03563 HLH 21339 b1    (k-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 2beginning with the 2026 tax year (to be collected in 2027), the 3total tax bill for property receiving the General Homestead 4Exemption under this Section may not exceed 103% of the total 5property tax bill for the property for the immediately 6preceding taxable year. If the property's tax liability is 7reduced as a result of the provisions of this subsection, then 8the disbursements to each taxing districts in which the 9property is located shall be reduced according to each taxing 10district's proportionate share of the property's total tax 11liability for the taxable year. The chief county assessment 12officer shall adopt rules and policies to reallocate the 13responsibility for the property tax revenue that is lost as a 14result of the application of this subsection to other property 15in the taxing district on a pro rata basis. 16    (l) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 17Act of the 100th General Assembly are effective for the 2018 18tax year and thereafter. 19(Source: P.A. 102-895, eff. 5-23-22.)